Illinois, session 104th, SB860.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-100 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/1-100)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 1-100)7    Sec. 1-100. Short Title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Vehicle Code.9    Portions of this Act may likewise be cited by a short title 10as follows:11    Chapters 2, 3, 4 and 5: the Illinois Vehicle Title & 12Registration Law.13    Chapter 6: the Illinois Driver Licensing Law.14    Chapter 7: the Illinois Safety and Family Financial 15Responsibility Law.16    Chapter 11: the Illinois Rules of the Road.17    Chapter 12: the Illinois Vehicle Equipment Law.18    Chapter 13: the Illinois Vehicle Inspection Law.19    Chapter 14: the Illinois Vehicle Equipment Safety Compact.20    Chapter 15: the Illinois Size and Weight Law.21    Chapter 17: the Illinois Highway Safety Law.22    Chapter 18a: the Illinois Commercial Relocation of 23Trespassing Vehicles Law.  SB0860- 2 -LRB104 07218 LNS 17255 b1    Chapter 18b: the Illinois Motor Carrier Safety Law.2    Chapter 18c: the Illinois Commercial Transportation Law.3    Chapter 18d: The Illinois Commercial Safety Towing Law. 4(Source: P.A. 95-562, eff. 7-1-08.)